Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-246
Conveyances; power
of attorney; how revoked.

No instrument containing
a power to convey, or in any manner to affect real estate, executed, acknowledged
or proved, and certified and recorded in conformity with the requirements
of sections 76-211 to 76-245 and
76-2,126, can be revoked by any act of the party or parties thereto
until the instrument of revocation is executed, acknowledged or proved, and
certified and filed for record with the register of deeds of the county in
which the power is recorded.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 22, p. 285;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 17, p. 369;

R.S.1913, § 6216;

C.S.1922, § 5615;

C.S.1929, § 76-221;

R.S.1943, § 76-246;

Laws 2012, LB536, § 33.